Alabama, session 2026rs, SB352.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
47 Section 1. Section 22-21-340.1 is added to the Code of
48 Alabama 1975:
49 §22-21-340.1
50 (a)(1) Pursuant to Section 22-21-340, a governing body
51 of a political subdivision that has authorized, or that is
52 located within the service area of, an existing authority, may
53 authorize the incorporation of a new authority that is
54 intended to encompass part of the service area of the existing
55 authority upon application made to the governing body
56 according to the requirements of Section 22-21-313.
Page 2

according to the requirements of Section 22-21-313.
SB352 INTRODUCED
57 (2) In a resolution authorizing the incorporation of a
58 new authority pursuant to Section 22-21-313(b), the governing
59 body of the authorizing subdivision shall include, as part of
60 the determination that it is wise, expedient, and necessary
61 that a new authority be incorporated, as many of the following
62 reasons as may apply:
63 a. In the absence of a separate authority, the
64 financial viability and survival of existing health care
65 facilities is in doubt.
66 b. The geographic area proposed to be served by the new
67 authority may receive more efficient or accessible health care
68 services and infrastructure than is currently the case under
69 the existing authority.
70 c. Conflicts concerning priorities in health care
71 delivery, planning, budgeting, revenue, or allocation of
72 resources exist between the board of directors or a governing
73 body of other authorizing subdivisions of the existing
74 authority, and the authorizing subdivision or individuals
75 involved in governance or operation of a health care facility
76 located in the proposed service area of the new authority,
77 which, after good faith efforts, cannot be satisfactorily
78 resolved in the existing authority.
79 (3)a. Upon authorization of the incorporation of a new
80 authority under subdivision (1), the applicants shall file a
81 certificate of incorporation for the new authority according
82 to, and in conformity with, the requirements of Section
83 22-21-314. The certificate of incorporation shall include a
84 description of the existing health care facilities and other
Page 3

description of the existing health care facilities and other
SB352 INTRODUCED
85 assets that the new authority intends to acquire and operate
86 from the existing authority.
87 b. The board of directors of the new authority shall be
88 comprised of members who do not currently serve on the board
89 of directors of the existing authority, and shall otherwise be
90 appointed in accordance with Section 22-21-316(a), including
91 the requirement that a majority of members be chosen by the
92 governing body of the authorizing subdivision.
93 (b)(1) The incorporators of the new authority shall
94 serve by certified U.S. mail, return receipt requested, a copy
95 of the certificate of incorporation to all of the following:
96 a. The governing body of each authorizing subdivision
97 of the existing authority.
98 b. The board of directors of the existing authority.
99 c. The board of directors of each health care facility
100 or hospital corporation located within the service area of the
101 existing authority.
102 (2) Upon receipt by the parties listed in subdivision
103 (1) of the certificate of incorporation of the new authority,
104 all of the following actions shall occur:
105 a. The board of the existing authority, pursuant to
106 Section 22-21-315, shall amend the certificate of
107 incorporation to reflect that the service area shall no longer
108 encompass the service area of the new authority. In so doing,
109 the board may change the name of the existing authority
110 pursuant to Section 22-21-314(b)(2) to more accurately reflect
111 the reduction in area of the existing authority.
112 b. The authorizing subdivisions of the existing
Page 4

b. The authorizing subdivisions of the existing
SB352 INTRODUCED
113 authority shall, by resolution, approve the amendment required
114 in paragraph a. according to the procedure provided in Section
115 22-21-315(b).
116 (3) No more than 10 days after the filing and recording
117 of the amended certificate of incorporation for the existing
118 authority in the office of the Judge of Probate as required by
119 Section 22-21-315(c), the Judge of Probate shall enter an
120 order that contains all of the following:
121 a. Directs the board of directors of the existing
122 authority and the board of directors of the new authority to
123 commence development of the plan required by subsection (c),
124 to be finalized in no more than 12 months from the date of
125 entry of the order.
126 b. Directs the board of directors of the existing
127 authority and the board of directors of the new authority to
128 report periodically to the Judge of Probate on the status of
129 the plan development required by subsection (c), on no less
130 than a quarterly basis. Each report shall summarize in writing
131 the matters upon which the two boards have reached agreement
132 and the matters upon which agreement has not been attained.
133 (c)(1) The board of directors of the existing authority
134 shall promptly negotiate in good faith with the board of
135 directors of the new authority to develop a plan for the
136 separation, governance, and operation of the two authorities
137 which shall address, but not be limited to, all of the
138 following matters:
139 a. The transfer of ownership of health care facilities,
140 health care services, real property, and other tangible or
Page 5

health care services, real property, and other tangible or
SB352 INTRODUCED
141 intangible assets to the new authority.
142 b. Required changes in corporate ownership or
143 governance of affected health care facilities or health care
144 services to be delivered by the new authority, including
145 amendment, reincorporation, or dissolution of public hospital
146 corporations that are agents or instrumentalities of, or which
147 share executives, directors, employees, contractors, or
148 facilities with, the existing authority.
149 c. With respect to outstanding liabilities of the
150 existing authority, including, but not limited to, indentures,
151 securities, coupon payments, or loans, the assumption by the
152 new authority of an equitable proportion of outstanding
153 liabilities, including periodic debt service, that reflects
154 the benefit conferred on health care infrastructure in the
155 service area of the new authority by any of the obligations.
156 d. With respect to income of the existing authority
157 from revenue sources, including, but not limited to, loan
158 proceeds, securities, federal, state, or private grants,
159 revenue streams from the state and authorizing subdivisions
160 designated to the existing authority in the form of proceeds
161 from any property tax, privilege tax, license, or other fees,
162 allocation to the new authority of an equitable proportion of
163 the income that reflects the intent or purpose of any of the
164 revenue as applicable to benefit health care delivery or
165 infrastructure in the service area of the new authority.
166 e. Distribution to, or sharing between, the two
167 authorities of outstanding contractual obligations relating to
168 health care delivery, including physician or other licensed
Page 6

health care delivery, including physician or other licensed
SB352 INTRODUCED
169 health care professional service contracts, laboratory
170 facilities or services, diagnostic or durable medical
171 equipment, home health delivery, emergency medical service
172 providers, or urgent care, including free-standing facilities
173 or clinics.
174 f. Distribution to, or sharing between, the two
175 authorities of contractual obligations relating to operation
176 or maintenance of health care delivery infrastructure,
177 including employment or staffing contracts, capital
178 improvements, provision or maintenance of information
179 technology, payroll, insurance, cafeteria, office equipment,
180 security, furniture, vehicles, janitorial service, or
181 landscaping.
182 (2) The plan shall be developed to avoid: (i) an
183 interruption in health care delivery in the communities
184 affected by the transition from one to two authorities; (ii)
185 significant disruption in the working conditions or
186 obligations of employees and contractors; and (iii) default in
187 servicing outstanding financial obligations.
188 (3) The negotiating boards may retain, as required,
189 outside legal and accounting services, and other necessary
190 expertise to advise, recommend, and provide professional
191 services necessary to formulate, finalize, and implement the
192 plan required, the fees for which shall be borne equally by
193 the two authorities.
194 (4) At any time, the negotiating boards may retain a
195 mediator to facilitate discussion and propose resolution of
196 issues or terms of the plan.
Page 7

issues or terms of the plan.
SB352 INTRODUCED
197 (5) The plan as finalized shall be a contract that is
198 enforceable by either authority, any authorizing subdivision
199 of either authority, or any affected health care facility, by
200 any remedy available at law or equity in the court of probate
201 with jurisdiction over the plan as provided in subdivision
202 (b)(3).
203 (d)(1) At any time during the development of the plan
204 required by subsection (c), any matter in controversy or
205 requiring settlement may be referred by the judge of probate
206 to arbitration by settlement upon:
207 a. Petition filed by the board of either authority, an
208 authorizing subdivision of either authority, or an affected
209 health care facility; or
210 b. Upon order entered, sua sponte, by the judge of
211 probate.
212 (2) The judge of probate shall appoint by order a
213 disinterested arbitrator who has experience in the resolution
214 of disputes that involve the acquisition, divestiture, or
215 dissolution of business or nonprofit entities, assets, and
216 obligations.
217 (3) The order required in subdivision (2) shall specify
218 the matters in controversy for resolution.
219 (4)a. The arbitration proceedings shall be conducted in
220 accordance with the Guidelines for Arbitration Proceedings in
221 Alabama published by the Alabama Supreme Court Commission on
222 Dispute Resolution.
223 b. The judge of probate may enter any order concerning
224 the conduct of the arbitration, on motion of one of the
Page 8

the conduct of the arbitration, on motion of one of the
SB352 INTRODUCED
225 parties in paragraph (1)a. or the arbitrator, or sua sponte,
226 relating to enforcement of any order of the arbitrator,
227 including a finding of civil contempt or appropriate
228 injunctive relief.
229 (5) The arbitrator shall issue a written award that
230 resolves the matters referred for arbitration, which shall be
231 distributed to the negotiating boards. The arbitrator shall
232 submit the written award to the judge of probate no more 10
233 days from issuance. The judge of probate may do any of the
234 following no less than 10 days after submission by the
235 arbitrator:
236 a. Adopt and enter the award as an order of the court.
237 b. Set aside the award in whole or in part, and refer
238 the matters in dispute to the same arbitrator with
239 instructions or to a different arbitrator.
240 c. Schedule a hearing no more than 30 days from the
241 filing of an objection to the award by one of the negotiating
242 boards, which objection shall be filed with the judge of
243 probate no more than 10 days from the arbitrator's issuance of
244 the award.
245 (6) If a hearing is conducted pursuant to paragraph
246 (5)c., the judge of probate shall enter an order no more than
247 10 days after the hearing which:
248 a. Adopts and enters the award as an order of the
249 court, to include any modification that the judge of probate
250 deems equitable or appropriate; or
251 b. Sets aside the award in whole or in part, and refers
252 the matters in dispute to the same arbitrator with
Page 9

the matters in dispute to the same arbitrator with
SB352 INTRODUCED
253 instructions or to a different arbitrator.
254 (7) An order of the judge of probate approving an award
255 pursuant to subdivision (5) or (6) shall be final and
256 conclusive on the two boards and authorities, including an
257 order approving an award in part as to those matters decided
258 therein. The terms of the award shall be enforceable by either
259 authority, any authorizing subdivision of either authority, or
260 any affected health care facility, by any remedy available at
261 law or equity in the court of probate with jurisdiction over
262 development of the plan.
263 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
264 1, 2026.
Page 10